Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.230

Restrictions and requirements by director.

Any mutual savings bank engaging in any activity contemplated in RCW 32.08.225, whereby it holds or purchases subordinated securities, issues letters of credit to secure a portion of any sale or issue of loans sold or exchanged, or in any manner acts as a partial guarantor or insurer or repurchaser of any loans sold or exchanged, shall do so only in accordance with such reasonable restrictions and requirements as the director shall require and shall report and carry such transactions on its books and records in such manner as the director shall require. In establishing any requirements and restrictions hereunder, the director shall consider the effect the transaction and the reporting thereof will have on the safety and soundness of the mutual savings bank engaging in it.

[ 1994 c 92 s 322; 1981 c 86 s 13.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 86: See note following RCW 32.08.140.